en: Coolant technology: HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Acid Technology); Lobrid; OAT (Organic Acid Technology); Other/Unknown; P-HOAT (Phosphated HOAT); Si-OAT (Silicated OAT); Other
ja: クーラント技術: HOAT (ハイブリッド有機酸技術); IAT (無機酸技術); ロブリッド; OAT (有機酸技術); その他 / 不明; P-HOAT (リン酸HOAT); Si-OAT (ケイ酸OAT); その他
ru: Технология охлаждающей жидкости: HOAT (гибридная органическая кислотная технология); IAT (неорганическая кислотная технология); Лобридная; OAT (органическая кислотная технология); Другое / Неизвестно; P-HOAT (фосфатная HOAT); Si-OAT (силикатная OAT); Другое
lt-LT: Aušinimo skysčio technologija: HOAT (hibridinė organinių rūgščių technologija); IAT (neorganinių rūgščių technologija); „Lobrid“; OAT (organinių rūgščių technologija); Kita / nežinoma; P-HOAT (fosfatinė HOAT); Si-OAT (silikatinė OAT); Kita
fr: Technologie de refroidissement: HOAT (Technologie hybride d'acide organique); IAT (Technologie d'acide inorganique); Lobride; OAT (Technologie d'acide organique); Autre/inconnu; P-HOAT (HOAT phosphaté); Si-OAT (OAT silicaté); Autre
pt-BR: Tecnologia do líquido de arrefecimento: HOAT (Tecnologia de Ácido Orgânico Híbrido); IAT (Tecnologia de Ácido Inorgânico); Lobrid; OAT (Tecnologia de Ácido Orgânico); Outro/Desconhecido; P-HOAT (HOAT Fosfatado); Si-OAT (OAT Silicatado); Outro
nb: Kjølevæsketeknologi: HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Acid Technology); Lobrid; OAT (Organic Acid Technology); Annet/ukjent; P-HOAT (fosfatert HOAT); Si-OAT (silikatert OAT); Annet
cs: Technologie chladicí kapaliny: HOAT (hybridní technologie organických kyselin); IAT (technologie anorganických kyselin); Lobrid; OAT (technologie organických kyselin); Jiné/neznámé; P-HOAT (fosfátová HOAT); Si-OAT (silikátová OAT); Jiné
de: Kühlmitteltechnologie: HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Acid Technology); Lobrid; OAT (Organic Acid Technology); Andere/Unbekannt; P-HOAT (Phosphated HOAT); Si-OAT (Silicated OAT); Sonstige
pt-PT: Tecnologia do líquido de refrigeração: HOAT (Tecnologia de ácidos orgânicos híbridos); IAT (Tecnologia de ácidos inorgânicos); Lobrid; OAT (Tecnologia de ácidos orgânicos); Outro/desconhecido; P-HOAT (HOAT fosfatado); Si-OAT (OAT silicatado); Outra
fi: Jäähdytysnesteteknologia: HOAT (hybridinen orgaaninen happoteknologia); IAT (epäorgaaninen happoteknologia); Lobridi; OAT (orgaaninen happoteknologia); Muu/Tuntematon; P-HOAT (fosfatoitu HOAT); Si-OAT (silikoitu OAT); Muu
zh-CN: 冷却液技术: HOAT（混合有机酸技术）; IAT（无机酸技术）; Lobrid; OAT（有机酸技术）; 其他/未知; P-HOAT（磷酸混合有机酸技术）; Si-OAT（硅酸有机酸技术）; 其他
vi: Công nghệ chất làm mát: HOAT (Công nghệ axit hữu cơ lai); IAT (Công nghệ axit vô cơ); Lobrid; OAT (Công nghệ axit hữu cơ); Khác/Không xác định; P-HOAT (HOAT chứa photphat); Si-OAT (OAT chứa silicat); Khác
sl-SI: Tehnologija hladilne tekočine: HOAT (tehnologija hibridnih organskih kislin); IAT (tehnologija anorganskih kislin); Lobrid; OAT (tehnologija organskih kislin); Drugo/neznano; P-HOAT (fosfatirani HOAT); Si-OAT (silikatni OAT); Drugo
nl: Koelvloeistoftechnologie: HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Acid Technology); Lobrid; OAT (Organic Acid Technology); Overig/onbekend; P-HOAT (gefosfateerde HOAT); Si-OAT (gesiliceerde OAT); Overig
ko: 냉각 기술: HOAT(하이브리드 유기산 기술); IAT(무기산 기술); 로브리드; OAT(유기산 기술); 기타/알 수 없음; P-HOAT(인산염 HOAT); Si-OAT(규산염 OAT); 기타
tr: Soğutma sıvısı teknolojisi: HOAT (Hibrit Organik Asit Teknolojisi); IAT (İnorganik Asit Teknolojisi); Lobrid; OAT (Organik Asit Teknolojisi); Diğer/Bilinmeyen; P-HOAT (Fosfatlı HOAT); Si-OAT (Silikatlı OAT); Diğer
hr-HR: Tehnologija rashladne tekućine: HOAT (tehnologija hibridnih organskih kiselina); IAT (tehnologija anorganskih kiselina); Lobrid; OAT (tehnologija organskih kiselina); Ostalo/nepoznato; P-HOAT (fosfatirani HOAT); Si-OAT (silikatirani OAT); Ostalo
bg-BG: Технология на охладителната течност: HOAT (хибридна технология с органични киселини); IAT (технология с неорганични киселини); Лобридна (Lobrid); OAT (технология с органични киселини); Друга/неизвестна; P-HOAT (фосфатирана HOAT); Si-OAT (силикатирана OAT); Друга
hu: Hűtőfolyadék-technológia: HOAT (hibrid szerves savas technológia); IAT (szervetlen savas technológia); Lobrid; OAT (szerves savas technológia); Egyéb/ismeretlen; P-HOAT (foszfátozott HOAT); Si-OAT (szilikátozott OAT); Egyéb
zh-TW: 冷卻液技術: HOAT (混合有機酸技術); IAT (無機酸技術); Lobrid 型冷卻液; OAT (有機酸技術); 其他/未知; P-HOAT (磷酸鹽混合有機酸技術); Si-OAT (矽酸鹽有機酸技術); 其他
sk-SK: Technológia chladiacej kvapaliny: HOAT (hybridná technológia organických kyselín); IAT (technológia anorganických kyselín); Lobrid; OAT (technológia organických kyselín); Iné/neznáme; P-HOAT (fosfátová HOAT); Si-OAT (silikátová OAT); Iné
sv: Kylvätsketeknik: HOAT (hybrid organic acid technology); IAT (inorganic acid technology); Lobrid; OAT (organic acid technology); Annan/okänd; P-HOAT (fosfaterad HOAT); Si-OAT (silikatiserad OAT); Annan
es: Tecnología de refrigeración: HOAT (tecnología de ácido orgánico híbrido); IAT (tecnología de ácido inorgánico); Lobrid; OAT (tecnología de ácido orgánico); Otro/desconocido; P-HOAT (HOAT fosfatado); Si-OAT (OAT silicatado); Otro
th: เทคโนโลยีน้ำยาหล่อเย็น: HOAT (เทคโนโลยีกรดอินทรีย์แบบผสม); IAT (เทคโนโลยีกรดอนินทรีย์); ลูบริด (Lobrid); OAT (เทคโนโลยีกรดอินทรีย์); อื่นๆ/ไม่ทราบ; P-HOAT (HOAT แบบฟอสเฟต); Si-OAT (OAT แบบซิลิเกต); อื่นๆ
pl: Technologia płynu chłodzącego: HOAT (Hybrydowa Technologia Kwasów Organicznych); IAT (Technologia Kwasów Nieorganicznych); Lobrid; OAT (Technologia Kwasów Organicznych); Inna/Nieznana; P-HOAT (Fosforanowa HOAT); Si-OAT (Krzemianowa OAT); Inna
ro-RO: Tehnologia lichidului de răcire: HOAT (Tehnologie cu acizi organici hibrizi); IAT (Tehnologie cu acizi anorganici); Lobrid; OAT (Tehnologie cu acizi organici); Altele/Necunoscut; P-HOAT (HOAT fosfatat); Si-OAT (OAT silicat); Altele
el: Τεχνολογία ψυκτικού υγρού: HOAT (Τεχνολογία Υβριδικού Οργανικού Οξέος); IAT (Τεχνολογία Ανόργανου Οξέος); Lobrid; OAT (Τεχνολογία Οργανικού Οξέος); Άλλο/Άγνωστο; P-HOAT (Φωσφορική HOAT); Si-OAT (Πυριτική OAT); Άλλο
it: Tecnologia dei refrigeranti: HOAT (Tecnologia ibrida ad acidi organici); IAT (Tecnologia ad acidi inorganici); Lobrid; OAT (Tecnologia ad acidi organici); Altro/Sconosciuto; P-HOAT (HOAT fosfatato); Si-OAT (OAT silicato); Altro
da: Kølemiddelteknologi: HOAT (Hybrid Organic Acid Technology); IAT (Inorganic Acid Technology); Lobrid; OAT (Organic Acid Technology); Andet/ukendt; P-HOAT (Phosphated HOAT); Si-OAT (Silicated OAT); Anden